src-fst-morphology-affixes-nouns.lexc.md
# Basque noun morphology 

## Locative nouns

**LEXICON NregLoc** for C-final, points to precases or to ordinary Nreg

**LEXICON NaLoc**  for a-final, points to precases or to Na

**LEXICON Precases**  , nouns that can denote a location, they can take another case in addition

## Ordinary nouns

**LEXICON Nreg**  for regular nouns, adding +N and pointing to Xreg

**LEXICON Xreg**  common lexicon for regular nominals (A, N)

**LEXICON NregBizi** for the bizi ones

**LEXICON Na** Vowel-final

**LEXICON NaBizi** for the vowel-final bizi ones

**LEXICON Bizidun** after animate noun phrases

## Case-number lexica

### Art cases

**LEXICON SgCases1** first group

**LEXICON SgCases2** second group

**LEXICON SgCases3** third group

**LEXICON PlCases1** plural first gropu

**LEXICON PlCases2** plural second group

**LEXICON PlCases3** plural third group

### Mgg cases

**LEXICON MggCases1** first group

**LEXICON MggCases2** second group

**LEXICON MggCases3** third group

* * *

<small>This (part of) documentation was generated from [src/fst/morphology/affixes/nouns.lexc](https://github.com/giellalt/lang-eus/blob/main/src/fst/morphology/affixes/nouns.lexc)</small>
